Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.290

Foreign statutes of limitation, how applied.

When the cause of action has arisen in another state, territory or country between nonresidents of this state, and by the laws of the state, territory or country where the action arose, an action cannot be maintained thereon by reason of the lapse of time, no action shall be maintained thereon in this state.

[Code 1881 s 46; 1877 p 10 s 47; 1854 p 365 s 20; RRS s 178.]